Vermont, session 2025-2026, S272.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Juvenile and Youthful Offender Proceedings * * *
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 5201 is amended to read:
§ 5201. COMMENCEMENT OF DELINQUENCY PROCEEDINGS
* * *
(c)(1) Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed
an act specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title after attaining 14 years of
age, but not 22 years of age, shall originate in the Criminal Division of the
Superior Court, provided that jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance
with this chapter and chapter 52A of this title, unless the State’s Attorney files
the charge directly as a youthful offender petition in the Family Division.
* * *
(3) Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have
committed one of the following acts after attaining 16 years of age, but not 22
years of age, shall originate in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court,
provided that jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance with this chapter
and chapter 52A of this title, unless the State’s Attorney files the charge
directly as a youthful offender petition in the Family Division:
(A) using carrying a firearm while committing a felony in violation
of 13 V.S.A. § 4005, or an attempt to commit that offense; or
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 4 of 55
(B) trafficking a regulated drug in violation of 18 V.S.A. chapter 84,
subchapter 1, or an attempt to commit that offense; or
(C) aggravated stalking as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1063(a)(3), or an
attempt to commit that offense.
* * *
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 5204 is amended to read:
§ 5204. TRANSFER FROM FAMILY DIVISION OF THE SUPERIOR
COURT
(a) After a petition has been filed alleging delinquency, upon motion of the
State’s Attorney and after hearing, the Family Division of the Superior Court
may transfer jurisdiction of the proceeding to the Criminal Division of the
Superior Court if the child had attained 16 years of age but not 19 years of age
at the time the act was alleged to have occurred and the delinquent act set forth
in the petition is a felony not specified in subdivisions (1)–(11)(14) of this
subsection or if the child had attained 12 years of age but not 14 years of age at
the time the act was alleged to have occurred, and if the delinquent act set forth
in the petition was any of the following:
(1) arson causing death as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 501 or an attempt to
commit that offense;
(2) assault and robbery with a dangerous weapon as defined in 13
V.S.A. § 608(b) or an attempt to commit that offense;
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 5 of 55
(3) assault and robbery causing bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 608(c) or an attempt to commit that offense;
(4) aggravated assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1024 or an attempt to
commit that offense;
(5) murder as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2301 and aggravated murder as
defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2311 or an attempt to commit either of those offenses;
(6) manslaughter as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2304 or an attempt to
commit that offense;
(7) kidnapping as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2405 or an attempt to commit
that offense;
(8) unlawful restraint as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2406 or 2407 or an
attempt to commit that offense;
(9) maiming as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2701 or an attempt to commit
that offense;
(10) sexual assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 3252(a)(1) or (a)(2) or an
attempt to commit that offense; or
(11) aggravated sexual assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 3253 and
aggravated sexual assault of a child as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 3253a or an
attempt to commit either of those offenses;
(12) aggravated stalking as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1063(a)(3) or an
attempt to commit that offense;
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 6 of 55
(13) first degree aggravated domestic assault as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 1043 or second degree aggravated domestic assault as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 1044 or an attempt to commit either of those offenses; or
(14) lewd or lascivious conduct as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2601 or lewd
or lascivious conduct with a child as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2602 or an attempt
to commit either of those offenses.
* * *
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 5280 is amended to read:
§ 5280. COMMENCEMENT OF YOUTHFUL OFFENDER
PROCEEDINGS IN THE FAMILY DIVISION
(a) A youthful offender proceeding under this chapter shall be commenced
by:
(1) the filing of a youthful offender petition by a State’s Attorney in the
Criminal Division of the Superior Court; or
(2) transfer to the Family Court of a proceeding from the Criminal
Division of the Superior Court as provided in section 5281 of this title the
filing of a motion in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court by the State’s
Attorney, the defendant, or the court on its own motion requesting that a
defendant in a criminal proceeding who has attained 14 years of age but not 22
years of age at the time the offense is alleged to have been committed be
treated as a youthful offender.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 7 of 55
(b) A State’s Attorney may commence a proceeding in the Family Division
of the Superior Court concerning a child who is alleged to have committed an
offense after attaining 14 years of age but not 22 years of age that could
otherwise be filed in the Criminal Division.
(1) Upon the filing of a petition or a motion under subdivision (a)(1) or
(2) of this section and the entering of a conditional plea of guilty by the youth,
the Criminal Division of the Superior Court shall enter an order deferring the
sentence and hold a hearing on the motion. If the youth declines to enter a
conditional plea, youthful offender status shall be denied.
(2) As used in this subsection, “conditional plea of guilty” means
agreement by the parties to a plea arrangement that:
(A) includes outcomes for successful and unsuccessful youthful
offender rehabilitation program completion; and
(B) is conditioned on the granting of youthful offender status that
may be withdrawn in the event that youthful offender status is denied.
(c) If a State’s Attorney files a petition under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section, the The case shall proceed as provided under subsection 5281(b) of
this title. Except as provided in subdivision 5283(c)(2) of this title, upon the
commencement of a youthful offender proceeding, and after hearing from the
parties and the victim, the court may seal future proceedings until youthful
offender status is denied or revoked if it finds for good cause shown that
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 8 of 55
safeguarding the physical and psychological well-being of a youth under 18
years of age outweighs the public’s interest in open proceedings. The court
shall make specific findings on the record supporting an order under this
subsection.
(d)(1) Within 15 days after the Upon commencement of a youthful
offender proceeding pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the court shall
notify the youth that the youth is required to complete a risk and needs
screening, which shall be conducted by the Department or by a community
provider that has contracted with the Department to provide risk and needs
screenings. The notice shall inform the youth that youthful offender status
may be denied if the youth fails to participate in the risk and needs screening.
(2) The risk and needs screening shall be completed prior to the youthful
offender status hearing held pursuant to section 5283 of this title. Unless the
court extends the period for the risk and needs screening for good cause
shown, the Family Division court shall reject the case for youthful offender
treatment if the youth does not complete the risk and needs screening within 15
days after the offer for the risk and needs screening.
(3) The Department or the community provider shall report the risk level
result of the screening, the number and source of the collateral contacts made,
and the recommendation for charging or other alternatives to the State’s
Attorney.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 9 of 55
(4) Information related to the present alleged offense directly or
indirectly derived from the risk and needs screening or other conversation with
the Department or community-based provider shall not be used against the
youth in the youth’s criminal or juvenile case for any purpose, including
impeachment or cross-examination. However, the fact of participation in risk
and needs screening may be used in subsequent proceedings.
(e) The State’s Attorney shall may refer a youth directly to court diversion
a youth alleged to have committed any offense other than those specified in
subsection 5204(a) of this title who presents a low to moderate risk to reoffend
based on the results of the risk and needs screening, unless the State’s Attorney
states on the record at the hearing held pursuant to section 5283 of this title
why a referral would not serve the ends of justice. If the court diversion
program does not accept the case or if the youth fails to complete the program
in a manner deemed satisfactory and timely by the provider, the youth’s case
shall return to the State’s Attorney for charging consideration.
Sec. 4. 33 V.S.A. § 5281 is amended to read:
§ 5281. MOTION PROCEDURES IN CRIMINAL DIVISION OF
SUPERIOR COURT
(a) A motion may be filed in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court
requesting that a defendant under 22 years of age in a criminal proceeding who
had attained 12 years of age but not 22 years of age at the time the offense is
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 10 of 55
alleged to have been committed be treated as a youthful offender. The motion
may be filed by the State’s Attorney, the defendant, or the court on its own
motion.
(b) Unless the State’s Attorney refers the youth directly to court diversion
pursuant to subsection 5280(e) of this title, upon the filing of a motion under
this section or the filing of a youthful offender petition pursuant to section
5280 of this title, the Family Division court shall hold a hearing pursuant to
section 5283 of this title. Pursuant to section 5110 of this title, the The hearing
shall be confidential as provided in section 5284 of this title. Copies of all
records relating to the case shall be forwarded to the Family Division.
Conditions of release and any Department of Corrections supervision or
custody shall remain in effect until:
(1) the Family Division accepts the case for treatment as a youthful
offender and orders conditions of juvenile probation pursuant to section 5284
of this title;
(2) any conditions of release or bail are modified, amended, or vacated
pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 229; or
(3)(2) the case is otherwise concluded.
(c)(b)(1) If the Family Division court rejects the case for youthful offender
treatment pursuant to section 5284 of this title, the case shall be transferred to
the Criminal Division. The conditions of release imposed by the Criminal
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 11 of 55
Division shall remain in effect, and the case shall proceed as though the motion
for youthful offender treatment or youthful offender petition had not been
filed.
(2) Subject to Rule 11 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure and
Rule 410 of the Vermont Rules of Evidence, the Family Division’s court’s
denial of the motion for youthful offender treatment and any information
related to the youthful offender proceeding shall be inadmissible against the
youth for any purpose in the subsequent Criminal Division proceeding.
(d)(c) If the Family Division accepts the case for youthful offender
treatment, the case shall proceed to a confidential merits hearing or admission
pursuant to sections 5227-5229 of this title the youth shall not be permitted to
withdraw the youth’s plea of guilty after youthful offender status is approved
except to correct manifest injustice pursuant to Rule 32(d) of the Vermont
Rules of Criminal Procedure.
Sec. 5. 33 V.S.A. § 5282 is amended to read:
§ 5282. REPORT FROM THE DEPARTMENT
(a) Within 30 days after the youth has completed the risk and needs
screening pursuant to section 5280 of this title, unless the court extends the
period for good cause shown or the State’s Attorney refers the youth directly to
court diversion pursuant to subsection 5280(e) of this title, the Department for
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 12 of 55
Children and Families shall file a report with the Family Division of the
Superior Court.
(b) A report filed pursuant to this section shall include the following
elements:
(1) a recommendation as to whether diversion is appropriate for the
youth because the youth is a low to moderate risk to reoffend;
(2) a recommendation as to whether youthful offender status is
appropriate for the youth; and
(3) a description of the services that may be available for the youth.
(c) A report filed pursuant to this section is privileged and shall not be
disclosed to any person other than:
(1) the Department;
(2) the court;
(3) the State’s Attorney;
(4) the youth, the youth’s attorney, and the youth’s guardian ad litem;
(5) the youth’s parent, guardian, or custodian if the youth is under 18
years of age, unless the court finds that disclosure would be contrary to the best
interests of the child;
(6) the Department of Corrections; or
(7) any other person when the court determines that the best interests of
the youth would make such a disclosure desirable or helpful. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 13 of 55
Sec. 6. 33 V.S.A. § 5283 is amended to read:
§ 5283. DISPOSITION HEARING IN FAMILY DIVISION
(a) Timeline. Unless the State’s Attorney refers the youth directly to court
diversion pursuant to subsection 5280(e) of this title, a youthful offender
consideration disposition hearing shall be held not later than 60 days after the
transfer of the case from the Criminal Division or filing of a youthful offender
petition in the Family Division 30 days after the filing of a motion or the filing
of a youthful offender petition under section 5280 of this title.
(b) Notice. Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the State’s Attorney;
the youth; the youth’s parent, guardian, or custodian; the victim; the
Department; and the Department of Corrections. The court shall not exclude
any victim from the proceeding or any portion of it unless, after hearing from
the parties and the victim, the court makes a finding on the record of good
cause. As used in this subsection, “victim” means a person who is the victim
of a crime for which a youth is charged; a parent, guardian, or legal
representative of the victim; or a victim’s advocate.
(c) Hearing procedure.
(1) If the motion is contested, all parties shall have the right to present
evidence and examine witnesses. Hearsay may be admitted and may be relied
on to the extent of its probative value. If reports are admitted, the parties shall
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 14 of 55
be afforded an opportunity to examine those persons making the reports, but
sources of confidential information need not be disclosed.
(2) For individuals who had attained 18 years of age but not 22 years of
age at the time the act is alleged to have been committed, hearings under
5284(a) of this title shall be open to the public. All other youthful offender
proceedings shall be confidential.
(d) Burden of proof. The burden of proof shall be on the moving party to
prove by a preponderance of the evidence that a child should be granted
youthful offender status. If the court makes the motion, the burden shall be on
the youth.
(e) Further hearing. On its own motion or the motion of a party, the court
may schedule a further hearing within not more than 10 business days to obtain
reports or other information necessary for the appropriate disposition of the
case.
Sec. 7. 33 V.S.A. § 5284 is amended to read:
§ 5284. YOUTHFUL OFFENDER DETERMINATION AND DISPOSITION
ORDER
(a)(1) In a hearing on a motion or petition for youthful offender status, the
court shall first consider whether public safety will be protected by treating the
youth as a youthful offender. If the court finds that public safety will not be
protected by treating the youth as a youthful offender, the court shall deny the
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 15 of 55
motion and transfer the case to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court
pursuant to subsection 5281(d) of this title, the conditions of release imposed
by the Criminal Division shall remain in effect, and the case shall proceed as
though the motion or petition for youthful offender treatment had not been
filed. If the court finds that public safety will be protected by treating the
youth as a youthful offender, the court shall proceed to make a determination
under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) When determining whether public safety will be protected by
treating the youth as a youthful offender, the court shall consider, on the basis
of the evidence admitted:
(A) the nature and circumstances of the charge and whether violence
was involved;
(B) the youth’s mental health treatment history and needs;
(C) the youth’s substance abuse history and needs;
(D) the youth’s residential housing status;
(E) the youth’s employment and educational situation;
(F) whether the youth has complied with conditions of release;
(G) the youth’s criminal record and whether the youth has engaged in
subsequent criminal or delinquent behavior since the original charge;
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 16 of 55
(H) whether supervising the youth on youthful offender probation is
appropriate considering the nature of the charged offense and the age and
specialized needs of the youth;
(I) whether the youth has previously not successfully completed
youthful offender treatment or otherwise had youthful offender status revoked;
(J) whether the youth has connections to the community; and
(J)(K) the youth’s history of violence and history of illegal or violent
conduct involving firearms or other deadly weapons.
(b)(1) The court shall deny the motion if the court finds that:
(A) public safety will not be protected by treating the youth as a
youthful offender;
(B) the youth is not amenable to treatment or rehabilitation as a
youthful offender; or
(B)(C) there are insufficient services in the juvenile court system and
the Department for Children and Families and the Department of Corrections
to meet the youth’s treatment and rehabilitation needs.
(2) The court shall grant the motion if the court finds that:
(A) public safety will be protected by treating the youth as a youthful
offender;
(B) the youth is amenable to treatment or rehabilitation as a youthful
offender; and
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 17 of 55
(B)(C) there are sufficient services in the juvenile court system and
the Department for Children and Families and the Department of Corrections
to meet the youth’s treatment and rehabilitation needs.
(c)(1) If the court approves the motion for youthful offender treatment after
an adjudication pursuant to subsection 5281(d) of this title, the court:
(A) shall place the youth on conditions of probation pursuant to 28
V.S.A. chapter 5, or such additional conditions imposed by the court, provided
that the requirements of this subdivision (A) may be satisfied by entering the
single condition of probation required under subdivision (C) of this subdivision
(c)(1);
(B) shall approve a disposition case plan and impose conditions of
juvenile probation on the youth; and
(C) shall include as a condition of probation adherence to the
disposition case plan approved by the court; and
(B)(D) may transfer legal custody of the youth to a parent, relative,
person with a significant relationship with the youth, or Commissioner for
Children and Families, provided that any transfer of custody shall expire on the
youth’s 18th birthday.
(2) Prior to the approval of a disposition case plan, the court may refer a
child directly to a youth-appropriate community-based provider that has been
approved by the department and which that may include a community justice
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 18 of 55
center or a balanced and restorative justice program. Referral to a community-
based provider pursuant to this subdivision shall not require the court to place
the child on probation. If the community-based provider does not accept the
case or if the child fails to complete the program in a manner deemed
satisfactory and timely by the provider, the child shall return to the court for
further proceedings, including the imposition of the disposition order.
(d)(1) The Department for Children and Families and the Department of
Corrections shall be responsible for supervision of and providing services to
the youth until the youth reaches 22 years of age the earlier of:
(A) the youth successfully completing treatment and supervision; or
(B) the revocation of the youth’s youthful offender designation
pursuant to section 5285 of this title.
(2) Both Departments the Department for Children and Families and the
Department of Corrections shall designate a case manager who together shall
appoint a lead Department department to have final decision-making authority
over the case plan and the provision of services to the youth. The youth shall
be eligible for appropriate community-based programming and services
provided by both Departments the Agency of Human Services.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 19 of 55
Sec. 8. 33 V.S.A. § 5285 is amended to read:
§ 5285. MODIFICATION OR REVOCATION OF DISPOSITION
(a) If it appears that the youth has violated the terms of juvenile probation
ordered by the court pursuant to subdivision 5284(c)(1) of this title, a motion
for modification or revocation of youthful offender status may be filed in the
Family Division of the Superior Court. The court shall set the motion for
hearing as soon as practicable within 10 business days. The hearing may be
joined with a hearing on a violation of conditions of probation under section
5265 of this title. A Consistent with the procedures of 28 V.S.A. § 301, a
supervising juvenile or adult probation officer may detain in an adult facility a
youthful offender who has attained 18 years of age for violating conditions of
probation. A youthful offender who has not attained 18 years of age may be
detained in a facility for juveniles pursuant to section 5266 of this title. A
youthful offender who is detained prior to attaining 18 years of age may be
transferred to an adult facility after the offender attains 18 years of age.
(b) A hearing under this section shall be held in accordance with section
5268 of this title.
(c) If the court finds after the hearing that the youth has violated the terms
of his or her the youth’s probation, the court may:
(1) maintain the youth’s status as a youthful offender, with modified
conditions of juvenile probation if the court deems it appropriate;
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 20 of 55
(2) revoke the youth’s status as a youthful offender and transfer the case
with a record of the petition, affidavit, adjudication, disposition, and revocation
to the Criminal Division for sentencing; or
(3) transfer supervision of the youth to the Department of Corrections
with all of the powers and authority of the Department and the Commissioner
under Title 28, including graduated sanctions and electronic monitoring.
(d) If a youth’s status as a youthful offender is revoked and the case is
transferred to the Criminal Division pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) of this
section, the court shall enter a conviction of guilty based on the admission to or
finding of merits, hold a sentencing hearing, and impose sentence in
accordance with the conditional plea agreed to under subsection 5280(c) of this
title. Unless it serves the interest of justice, the case shall not be transferred
back to the Family Division pursuant to section 5203 of this title. When
determining an appropriate sentence, the court may take into consideration the
youth’s degree of progress toward or regression from rehabilitation while on
youthful offender status. The Criminal Division shall have access to all Family
Division records of the proceeding.
Sec. 9. 33 V.S.A. § 5286 is amended to read:
§ 5286. REVIEW PRIOR TO 18 YEARS OF AGE
(a) If a youth is on probation as a youthful offender prior to reaching 18
years of age, the Family Division court shall review the youth’s case before he
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 21 of 55
or she the youth reaches 18 years of age and set a hearing to determine whether
the court’s jurisdiction over the youth should be continued past 18 years of
age. The hearing may be joined with a motion to terminate youthful offender
status under section 5285 of this title. The court shall provide notice and an
opportunity to be heard at the hearing to the State’s Attorney, the youth, the
Department for Children and Families, and the Department of Corrections.
(b) After receiving a notice of review under this section, the State may file
a motion to modify or revoke pursuant to section 5285 of this title. If such a
motion is filed, it shall be consolidated with the review under this section and
all options provided for under section 5285 of this title shall be available to the
court.
(c) The following reports shall be filed with the court prior to the hearing:
(1) The Department for Children and Families and the Department of
Corrections shall jointly report their recommendations, with supporting
justifications, as to whether the Family Division court should continue
jurisdiction over the youth past 18 years of age and, if continued jurisdiction is
recommended, propose a case plan for the youth to ensure compliance with
and completion of the juvenile disposition.
(2) If the Departments departments recommend continued supervision
of the youthful offender past 18 years of age, the Departments departments
shall report on the services that would be available for the youth.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 22 of 55
(d) If the court finds that it is in the best interests of the youth and
consistent with community safety to continue the case past 18 years of age, it
shall make an order continuing the court’s jurisdiction up to 22 years of age.
The Department for Children and Families and the Department of Corrections
shall jointly develop a case plan for the youth and coordinate services and
share information to ensure compliance with and completion of the juvenile
youthful offender disposition.
(e) If the court finds that it is not in the best interests of the youth to
continue the case past 18 years of age, it shall terminate the disposition order,
discharge the youth, and dismiss the case in accordance with subsection
5287(c) of this title.
Sec. 10. 33 V.S.A. § 5287 is amended to read:
§ 5287. TERMINATION OR CONTINUANCE OF PROBATION
(a) A motion or stipulation may be filed at any time in the Family Criminal
Division requesting that the court terminate the youth’s status as a youthful
offender and discharge him or her the youth from probation. The motion may
be filed by the State’s Attorney, the youth, the Department, or the court on its
own motion.
(b) In determining whether a youth has successfully completed the terms of
probation, the court shall consider:
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 23 of 55
(1) the degree to which the youth fulfilled the terms of the case plan and
the probation order;
(2) the youth’s performance during treatment;
(3) reports of treatment personnel; and
(4) any other relevant facts associated with the youth’s behavior.
(c) If the court finds that the youth has successfully completed the terms of
the probation order, it shall terminate youthful offender status, discharge the
youth from probation, and file a written order dismissing the Family Division
case. The Family Division shall provide notice of the dismissal to the Criminal
Division, which shall dismiss the criminal case.
(d) Upon discharge and dismissal under subsection (c) of this section, all
records relating to the case in the Criminal Division shall be expunged, and all
records relating to the case in the Family Court shall be sealed pursuant to
section 5119 of this title sealed.
(e) If the court denies the motion to discharge the youth from probation, the
court may extend or amend the probation order as it deems necessary.
(f) Upon the termination of the period of probation, the youth shall be
discharged from probation.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 24 of 55
* * * Repeal of Raise the Age for 19-Year-Olds * * *
Sec. 11. 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 4, Secs. 5–10 are amended to read:
Sec. 5. [Deleted.]
Sec. 6. [Deleted.]
Sec. 7. [Deleted.]
Sec. 8. [Deleted.]
Sec. 9. [Deleted.]
Sec. 10. [Deleted.]
Sec. 12. 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 4, Sec. 11 is amended to read:
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATES; APPLICABILITY
(a) Secs. 1, and 2, and 10 shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
(b) Secs. 3 and 4 and this section shall take effect on March 31, 2025.
(c) Secs. 5–9 shall take effect on July 1, 2027. [Deleted.]
* * * Expedited Transfers Between the Family and Criminal Divisions * * *
Sec. 13. 33 V.S.A. § 5203 is amended to read:
§ 5203. TRANSFER FROM OTHER COURTS
* * *
(f) Motions to transfer made under this section shall be given priority by
the court and heard on an expedited basis.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 25 of 55
Sec. 14. 33 V.S.A. § 5204 is amended to read:
§ 5204. TRANSFER FROM FAMILY DIVISION OF THE SUPERIOR
COURT
* * *
(b)(1) The State’s Attorney of the county where the juvenile petition is
pending may move in the Family Division of the Superior Court for an order
transferring jurisdiction under subsection (a) of this section at any time prior to
adjudication on the merits. The filing of the motion to transfer jurisdiction
shall automatically stay the time for the hearing provided for in section 5225 of
this title, which stay shall remain in effect until such time as the Family
Division of the Superior Court may deny the motion to transfer jurisdiction.
Motions to transfer made under this subsection shall be given priority by the
court and heard on an expedited basis.
* * *
Sec. 15. 33 V.S.A. § 5280 is amended to read:
§ 5280. COMMENCEMENT OF YOUTHFUL OFFENDER
PROCEEDINGS IN THE FAMILY DIVISION
* * *
(f) Motions to transfer made under this section shall be given priority by
the court and heard on an expedited basis.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 26 of 55
* * * Bail * * *
Sec. 16. BAIL REVOCATION; INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that Vermont’s bail revocation
statute is consistent with State v. Sauve, 159 Vt. 566 (1993); State v. Gates,
2016 VT 36; and their progeny so that repeated failures to appear in court,
repeated violations of conditions of release, and other violations of court orders
constitute a compelling State interest that falls within the statutory definition of
“disrupts the prosecution.”
Sec. 17. 13 V.S.A. § 7575 is amended to read:
§ 7575. REVOCATION OF THE RIGHT TO BAIL
(a) The prosecutor, or the court on its own motion, may move to revoke
bail pursuant to this section.
(b) The right to bail may be revoked entirely if the judicial officer finds that
the accused has:
(1) intimidated or harassed a victim, potential witness, juror, or judicial
officer in violation of a condition of release; or
(2) repeatedly violated conditions of release in a manner that impedes
disrupts the prosecution of the accused; or
(3) violated a condition or conditions of release that constitute a threat to
the integrity of the judicial system; or
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 27 of 55
(4) without just cause, failed to appear at a specified time and place
ordered by a judicial officer; or
(5) in violation of a condition of release, been charged with a felony or a
crime against a person or an offense similar to the underlying charge, for
which, after hearing, probable cause is found.
(c) If the court revokes bail, it shall order the defendant’s immediate arrest
without a warrant if the person is within the State and declare any bond
pledged by the defendant forfeited.
(d)(1) If a defendant’s bail is revoked, the court shall set the defendant’s
case for trial not more than 60 days from the date of revocation.
(2) If the trial is not commenced within 60 days after revocation and the
delay is not attributable to the defense, the court shall immediately schedule a
bail hearing for the defendant.
(e) If a request to revoke bail is denied, an appeal may be taken by the State
to a single Justice of the Supreme Court who may hear the matter or at the
Justice’s discretion refer it to the entire Supreme Court for hearing. No further
appeal may lie from the ruling of a single Justice in matters to which this
subsection applies. Any order so appealed shall be affirmed if it is supported
by the proceedings below. If the order is not supported, the Supreme Court or
single Justice hearing the matter may remand the case for a further hearing or
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 28 of 55
may, with or without additional evidence, modify or vacate the order. The
appeal shall be determined promptly.
* * * Reduced, Suspended, and Deferred Sentences * * *
Sec. 18. 13 V.S.A. § 7031 is amended to read:
§ 7031. FORM OF SENTENCES; MAXIMUM AND MINIMUM TERMS
(a) When a respondent is sentenced to any term of imprisonment, other
than for life, the court imposing the sentence shall not fix the term of
imprisonment, unless the term is definitely fixed by statute, but shall establish
a maximum and may establish a minimum term for which the respondent may
be held in imprisonment. The maximum term shall not be more than the
longest term fixed by law for the offense of which the respondent is convicted,
and the minimum term shall be not less than the shortest term fixed by law for
the offense. If the court suspends a portion of the sentence, the unsuspended
portion of the sentence shall be the minimum term of sentence solely for the
purpose of any reductions of term for good behavior as set forth in 28 V.S.A.
§ 811. A sentence shall not be considered fixed as long as the maximum and
minimum terms are not identical.
(b) The sentence of imprisonment of any person convicted of an offense
shall commence to run from the date on which the person is received at the
correctional facility for service of the sentence. The court shall give the person
credit toward service of his or her the person’s sentence for any days spent in
custody as follows:
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 29 of 55
(1) The period of credit for concurrent and consecutive sentences shall
include all days served from the date of arraignment or the date of the earliest
detention for the offense, whichever occurs first, and end on the date of the
sentencing. Only a single credit shall be awarded in cases of consecutive
sentences, and no credit for one period of time shall be applied to a later
period.
(2) In sentencing a violation of probation, the court shall give the person
credit for any days spent in custody from the time the violation is filed or the
person is detained on the violation, whichever occurs first, until the violation is
sentenced. In a case in which probation is revoked and the person is ordered to
serve the underlying sentence, the person shall receive credit for all time
previously served in connection with the offense.
(3) A defendant who has received pre-adjudication treatment in a
residential setting for a substance use disorder after the charge has been filed
shall earn a reduction of one day in the offender’s minimum and maximum
sentence for each day that the offender receives the inpatient treatment,
provided the defendant has no pending criminal charges.
(c) If any such person is committed to a jail or other place of detention to
await transportation to the place at which his or her the person’s sentence is to
be served, his or her the sentence shall commence to run from the date on
which he or she the person is received at the jail or the place of detention.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 30 of 55
(d) A person who receives a zero minimum sentence for a conviction of a
nonviolent misdemeanor or nonviolent felony as defined in 28 V.S.A. § 301
shall report to probation and parole as directed by the court and begin to serve
the sentence in the community immediately, unless the person is serving a
prior sentence at the time.
(e) For a conviction of a listed crime pursuant to subdivision 5301(7) of
this title, a court shall not order a sentence that is suspended, deferred, or
served as a supervised sentence if the person has a prior conviction for escape
pursuant to section 1501 of this title or three or more convictions for a felony
listed crime unless the court makes findings on the record that there are
compelling reasons why such a sentence will serve the interests of justice and
protect the public.
(f) A court shall not suspend, in whole or in part, a sentence for a person
who has previously been found to have violated probation, been
unsatisfactorily discharged from probation, or had furlough revoked unless the
court makes findings on the record that there are compelling reasons why such
a sentence will serve the interests of justice and protect the public.
Sec. 19. 13 V.S.A. § 7041 is amended to read:
§ 7041. DEFERRED SENTENCE
(a) Upon an adjudication of guilt and after the filing of a presentence
investigation report, the court may defer sentencing and place the respondent
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 31 of 55
on probation upon such terms and conditions as it may require if a written
agreement concerning the deferring of sentence is entered into between the
State’s Attorney and the respondent and filed with the clerk of the court.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the court may defer
sentencing and place the respondent on probation without a written agreement
between the State’s Attorney and the respondent if the following conditions are
met:
(1) [Repealed.]
(2) the crime for which the respondent is being sentenced is not a listed
crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title;
(3) the court orders a presentence investigation in accordance with the
procedures set forth in V.R.C.P. Rule 32, unless the State’s Attorney agrees to
waive the presentence investigation;
(4) the court permits the victim to submit a written or oral statement
concerning the consideration of deferment of sentence;
(5) the court reviews the presentence investigation and the victim’s
impact statement with the parties; and
(6) the court determines makes written findings that deferring sentence
is in the interests of justice.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the court may
not defer a sentence for a violation of section 3253a (aggravated sexual assault
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 32 of 55
of a child), section 2602 (lewd and lascivious conduct with a child unless the
victim and the defendant were within five years of age and the act was
consensual), 3252(c) (sexual assault of a child under 16 unless the victim and
the defendant were within five years of age and the act was consensual),
3252(d) or (e) (sexual assault of a child), 3253(a)(8) (aggravated sexual
assault), or 3253a (aggravated sexual assault of a child) of this title.
(d) Entry of deferment of sentence shall constitute an appealable judgment
for purposes of appeal in accordance with 12 V.S.A. § 2383 and V.R.A.P. Rule
3. Except as otherwise provided, entry of deferment of sentence shall
constitute imposition of sentence solely for the purpose of sentence review in
accordance with section 7042 of this title. The court may impose sentence at
any time if the respondent violates the conditions of the deferred sentence
during the period of deferment.
(e) Upon violation of the terms of probation or of the deferred sentence
agreement, the court shall impose sentence. Upon fulfillment of the terms of
probation and of the deferred sentence agreement, the court shall strike the
adjudication of guilt and discharge the respondent. Except as provided in
subsection (h) of this section, the record of the criminal proceedings shall be
expunged sealed upon the discharge of the respondent from probation, absent a
finding of good cause by the court. The court shall issue an order to expunge
seal all records and files related to the arrest, citation, investigation, charge,
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 33 of 55
adjudication of guilt, criminal proceedings, and probation related to the
deferred sentence. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency,
department, or official named therein. Thereafter, the court, law enforcement
officers, agencies, and departments shall reply to any request for information
that no record exists with respect to such person upon inquiry in the matter.
Notwithstanding this subsection, the record shall not be expunged sealed until
restitution has been paid in full.
(f) A deferred sentence imposed under subsection (a) or (b) of this section
may include a restitution order issued pursuant to section 7043 of this title.
Nonpayment of restitution shall not constitute grounds for imposition of the
underlying sentence.
(g) [Repealed.]
(h) The Vermont Crime Information Center shall retain a special index of
deferred sentences for sex offenses that require registration pursuant to
subchapter 3 of chapter 167, subchapter 3 of this title. This index shall only
list the name and date of birth of the subject of the expunged sealed files and
records, the offense for which the subject was convicted, and the docket
number of the proceeding that was the subject of the expungement sealing.
The special index shall be confidential and may be accessed only by the
director of the Vermont Crime Information Center and a designated clerical
staffperson for the purpose of providing information to the Department of
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 34 of 55
Corrections in the preparation of a presentence investigation in accordance
with 28 V.S.A. §§ 204 and 204a.
Sec. 20. 13 V.S.A. § 7042 is amended to read:
§ 7042. SENTENCE REVIEW
(a) Any court imposing a sentence under the authority of this title, within
90 days of the imposition of that sentence, or within 90 days after entry of any
order or judgment of the Supreme Court upholding a judgment of conviction,
may upon its own initiative or motion of the defendant, reduce the sentence.
(b) A State’s Attorney or the Attorney General, within seven business days
of the imposition of a sentence, may file with the sentencing judge a motion to
increase, reduce, or otherwise modify the sentence. This motion shall set forth
reasons why the sentence should be altered. After hearing, the court may
confirm, increase, reduce, or otherwise modify the sentence.
(c) After a motion is filed under subsection (b) of this section, a
defendant’s time for filing an appeal under 12 V.S.A. § 2383 shall commence
to run upon entry of a final order under subsection (b).
(d) A court shall not reduce the sentence for a conviction of a listed crime
as provided by subdivision 5301(7) of this title if the defendant has three or
more convictions for a listed crime or five or more pending criminal charges.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 35 of 55
* * * Recidivism * * *
Sec. 21. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds:
(1) The State’s current definition of recidivism is based upon offenders
who are sentenced to more than one year of incarceration and who, after
release, return to an incarcerative setting within three years, but only after
conviction of a new offense or a violation of Department of Corrections’
supervision and the new sentence for the violation is not fewer than 90 days.
(2) The vast majority of misdemeanor crimes have maximum terms of
imprisonment of not more than six months.
(3) Few, if any, misdemeanor sentences are served in a Department of
Corrections’ facility.
(4) Under current law, a person could commit 10 instances of retail theft
within a calendar year, be convicted of each separate offense and sentenced to
probation or incarcerative sentences of a few days for each offense, and the
behavior would not constitute recidivism.
(b) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) the definition of recidivism more accurately reflect new convictions,
returns to incarceration, and probation violations and revocations; and
(2) the State establish a statutory measure of violent crime recidivism
and of individual success.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 36 of 55
Sec. 22. 28 V.S.A. § 3 is amended to read:
§ 3. GENERAL DEFINITIONS
As used in this title:
(1) “Child” means any person:
(A) charged with having committed a delinquent act as defined in
33 V.S.A. § 5102 or adjudicated a delinquent and committed to the custody of
the Commissioner; or
(B) charged with being or adjudicated unmanageable as defined by
33 V.S.A. § 5102(3)(C) and (D), and committed to the custody of the
Commissioner for Children and Families and subsequently transferred to the
custody of the Commissioner.
(C) [Repealed.]
(2) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Corrections.
(3) “Correctional facility” or “facility” means any building, enclosure,
space, or structure of or supported by the Department and used for the
confinement of persons committed to the custody of the Commissioner, or for
any other matter related to such confinement.
(4) “Department” means the Department of Corrections.
(5) “Inmate” means any person, not a child, committed to the custody of
the Commissioner pursuant to the law of the State and subsequently committed
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 37 of 55
to a correctional facility and any person confined at a correctional facility
during the pendency of a prosecution against him or her the person.
(6) “Law” includes the laws and ordinances of the State, its political
subdivisions, and municipalities.
(7) “Law enforcement officer” means a State Police officer, a sheriff, a
deputy sheriff, a municipal police officer, a constable, the Commissioner, or a
member of the Department of Corrections when appointed in writing by the
Commissioner and when his or her the person’s appointment is filed in the
Office of the Secretary of State. The Commissioner or such member shall
have the same powers as a sheriff.
(8) “Offender” means any person convicted of a crime or offense under
the laws of this State, and, for purposes of work crew community restitution, a
person found in civil contempt under 15 V.S.A. § 603.
(9) “Supervising officer” means the highest administrative officer in
charge of any correctional facility.
(10) “Correctional officer” means any person who is an employee of the
Department of Corrections whose official duties or job classification includes
the supervision or monitoring of a person on parole, probation, or serving any
sentence of incarceration whether inside or outside a correctional facility, and
who has received training, as approved by the Commissioner of Corrections, as
provided in section 551a of this title.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 38 of 55
(11) “Recidivism” means a person who is convicted of a criminal
offense after receiving a criminal conviction for a previous crime.
(12) “Repeat violent offender” means a person who commits repeated
criminal offenses for which the crime type against another person is considered
violent.
(13) “Restorative justice program” means a program developed and
implemented by the Commissioner, consistent with State policy and legislative
intent as provided by section 2a of this title.
(12)(14) Despite other names this concept has been given in the past or
may be given in the future, “segregation” “Segregation” means a form of
separation from the general population that may or may not include placement
in a single-occupancy cell and that is used for disciplinary, administrative, or
other reasons, but shall not mean confinement to an infirmary or a residential
treatment setting for purposes of evaluation, treatment, or provision of
services.
Sec. 23. 28 V.S.A. § 4 is amended to read:
§ 4. STANDARD MEASURE AND CLASSIFICATIONS OF RECIDIVISM;
REPEAT VIOLENT OFFENDERS
(a) Recidivism.
(1) Classifications. The Department shall calculate classify the rate type
of recidivism based upon offenders persons who are sentenced to more than
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 39 of 55
one year of incarceration who, after release from incarceration, return to prison
within three years for a conviction for a new offense or a violation of
supervision resulting, and the new incarceration sentence or time served on the
violation is at least 90 days convicted of a criminal offense and meet one of the
following:
(A) Class one recidivism. Not less than one year has elapsed from
the time of sentencing before the person commits a new offense that results in
a conviction.
(B) Class two recidivism. Not less than three years have elapsed
from the time of sentencing before the person commits a new offense that
results in a conviction.
(C) Class three recidivism. Not less than five years have elapsed
from the time of sentencing before the person commits a new offense that
results in a conviction.
(D) Class four recidivism. Not less than 10 years have elapsed from
the time of sentencing before the person commits a new offense that results in
a conviction.
(2) Calculations.
(A) Persons sentenced to incarceration will be considered eligible to
recidivate upon release from a correctional facility.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 40 of 55
(B) Persons sentenced to a noncarceral sentence are considered
eligible to recidivate on the disposition date of a case.
(C) A conviction shall determine whether a person has recidivated.
(D) The arraignment date associated with the conviction shall
determine the recidivism classification.
(b) Repeat violent offenders. The Department shall calculate the rate of
repeat violent offenders based upon persons who are convicted of a criminal
offense and meet one of the following classifications:
(1) Class one repeat violence. Not less than one year has elapsed from
the time of sentencing before the person is convicted of a violent offense.
(2) Class two repeat violence. Not less than three years have elapsed
from the time of sentencing before the person is convicted of a violent offense.
(3) Class three repeat violence. Not less than five years have elapsed
from the time of sentencing before the person is convicted of a violent offense.
(4) Class four repeat violence. Not less than 10 years have elapsed from
the time of sentencing before the person is convicted of a violent offense.
Sec. 24. 28 V.S.A. § 125(b) is amended to read:
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
* * *
(5) “Recidivism” has the same meaning as in section 4 subdivision 3(11)
of this title.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 41 of 55
Sec. 25. 13 V.S.A. § 7555 is amended to read:
§ 7555. PRETRIAL SUPERVISION PROGRAM
(a) Purpose. The purpose of the Pretrial Supervision Program is to assist
eligible people through the use of evidence-based strategies to improve pretrial
compliance with conditions of release, to coordinate and support the provision
of pretrial services when appropriate, to ensure attendance at court
appearances, and to decrease the potential to recidivate while awaiting trial.
(b) Definition. As used in this section, “absconded” has the same meaning
as “absconding” as defined in 28 V.S.A. § 722(1)(B)–(C)(1)(B) and (C).
(c) Pretrial supervision.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, beginning on
January 1, 2025, the Pretrial Supervision Program shall, if ordered by the court
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, monitor defendants who have been
charged with violating a condition of release pursuant to section 7559 of this
title or have not fewer than five pending dockets and pose a risk of
nonappearance at court hearings, a risk of flight, or a risk of endangering the
public.
(2) The Department shall assign a pretrial supervision officer to monitor
defendants in a designated region of Vermont and help coordinate any pretrial
services needed by the defendant. The Department shall determine the
appropriate level of supervision using evidence-based screenings of those
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 42 of 55
defendants eligible to be placed in the Program. The Department’s supervision
levels may include use of:
(A) the Department’s telephone monitoring system;
(B) telephonic meetings with a pretrial supervision officer;
(C) in-person meetings with a pretrial supervision officer;
(D) electronic monitoring; or
(E) any other means of contact deemed appropriate.
(3) When placing a defendant into the Program pursuant to subsection
(d) of this section, the court shall issue an order that sets the defendant’s level
of supervision based on the recommendations submitted by the Department of
Corrections.
(d) Procedure.
(1) At arraignment or at a subsequent hearing, the prosecutor or the
defendant may move, or on the court’s own motion, that the defendant be
reviewed by the court to determine whether the defendant is appropriate for
pretrial supervision. The review shall be scheduled upon the court’s receipt of
a report from the Department of Corrections containing recommendations
pertaining to the defendant’s supervision level.
(2) A defendant is eligible for pretrial supervision if the person has:
(A) violated conditions of release pursuant to section 7559 of this
title; or
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 43 of 55
(B) not fewer than five pending court dockets.
(3) After a hearing and review of the Department of Corrections’ report
containing the defendant’s supervision level recommendations, the court may
order that the defendant be released to the Pretrial Supervision Program,
provided that the court finds placing the defendant under pretrial supervision
will reasonably ensure the person’s appearance in court when required, will
reasonably mitigate the risk of flight, or reasonably ensure protection of the
public. In making such a determination, the court shall consider the following:
(A) the nature of the violation of conditions of release pursuant to
section 7559 of this title;
(B) the nature and circumstances of the underlying offense or
offenses with which the defendant is charged;
(C) the defendant’s prior convictions, history of violence, medical
and mental health needs, history of supervision, and risk of flight;
(D) any risk or undue burden to third parties or risk to public safety
that may result from the placement; or
(E) any other factors that the court deems appropriate.
(e) Compliance and review.
(1) Pretrial supervision officers shall notify the prosecutor or the court
and use reasonable efforts to notify the defendant of any violations of court-
imposed Program conditions committed by the defendant.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 44 of 55
(2) Pretrial supervision officers may notify the prosecutor or the court
and use reasonable efforts to notify the defendant of any violations of
Department-imposed administrative conditions committed by the defendant.
(3) Upon the motion of the prosecutor or the defendant, or on the court’s
own motion, a defendant’s compliance with pretrial supervision conditions
may be reviewed by the court.
(4) Upon submission of the pretrial supervision officer’s sworn affidavit
to the court by either the prosecutor or the pretrial supervision officer, the
court:
(A) may issue a warrant for the arrest of a defendant who fails to
report to the pretrial supervision officer, commits multiple one or more
violations of supervision requirements, or has absconded; and
(B) shall issue a warrant for the arrest of a defendant who meets the
criteria of subdivision (A) of this subdivision (e)(4) if the defendant also has
five or more pending criminal charges.
(f) Policies and procedures.
(1) On or before November 1, 2024, the Department of Corrections shall
establish written policies and procedures for the Pretrial Supervision Program
to be used by the Department and any contractors or grantees that the
Department engages with to assist in the monitoring operations of the Program
and to assist the courts in understanding the Program.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 45 of 55
(2) The Department shall develop policies and procedures concerning
supervision levels, evidence-based criteria for each supervision level, and the
means of contact that is appropriate for each supervision level.
(g) Contingent on funding. The Pretrial Supervision Program established
in this section shall operate only to the extent funds are appropriated for its
operation. If the Program is not operating in a particular county, the courts
shall not order pretrial supervision as a condition of release in accordance with
section 7554 of this title.
(h) Program support. The Department may support the operation of the
Program through grants of financial assistance to, or contracts for services
with, any public entity that meets the Department’s requirements.
* * * Repeal of Earned Time and Midpoint Review * * *
Sec. 26. REPEAL
28 V.S.A. § 818 (earned time; reduction of term) is repealed.
Sec. 27. 28 V.S.A. § 252 is amended to read:
§ 252. CONDITIONS OF PROBATION AND MIDPOINT REVIEW
* * *
(d) Review and recommendation for discharge.
(1) The Commissioner shall review the record of each probationer
serving a specified term during the month prior to the midpoint of that
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 46 of 55
probationer’s specified term and shall file a motion requesting the sentencing
court to dismiss the probationer from probation if the offender:
(A) has not been found by the court to have violated the conditions of
probation in the six months prior to the review;
(B) is not serving a sentence for committing a crime specified in 13
V.S.A. chapter 19, subchapters 6 and 7; 13 V.S.A. chapter 72, subchapter 1; or
13 V.S.A. § 2602; and
(C) has completed those rehabilitative or risk reduction services
required as a condition of probation that have a duration that is set and
knowable at the outset of probation.
(2) If the probationer does not meet the criteria set forth in subdivision
(1) of this subsection, the Commissioner shall file a motion requesting the
sentencing court to discharge the probation term once the probationer meets
the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) If a probationer meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this
subsection and is subject to a pending criminal charge or violation of probation
complaint, the Commissioner may file a motion requesting the sentencing
court to dismiss the probationer from probation pursuant to this subsection.
The motion shall identify the pending criminal charge or probation violation.
After any pending criminal charges and probation violations are resolved, and
if the probationer still meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 47 of 55
subsection, the Commissioner shall file the motion requesting the sentencing
court to dismiss the probationer from probation.
(4) The prosecutor shall make a reasonable effort to notify any victim of
record of a motion filed to reduce a probationer’s term pursuant to this
subsection. “Reasonable effort” means attempting to contact the victim by
first-class mail at the victim’s last known address and by telephone at the
victim’s last known phone number.
(5) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, and notwithstanding the
requirement in subdivision (1) of this subsection that the Commissioner review
the probationer’s record during the month prior to the midpoint of that
probationer’s specified term, this subsection shall apply retroactively to any
probationer serving a specified term of probation. If the probationer has
already reached the midpoint of that probationer’s specified term on or before
the effective date of this act, the Commissioner shall review the probationer’s
record as soon as possible for purposes of filing a motion pursuant to this
section. [Repealed.]
Sec. 28. PROSPECTIVE EFFECT
(a) Sec. 26 of this act shall not be construed to limit or affect earned time
that an offender has earned on or before the effective date of this act.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 48 of 55
(b) Sec. 27 of this act shall not be construed to limit or affect orders to
dismiss or discharge a defendant from probation pursuant to this section issued
by the court on or before the effective date of this act.
* * * Forensic Facility * * *
Sec. 29. 13 V.S.A. § 4815a is added to read:
§ 4815a. COMPETENCY RESTORATION SERVICES WITHIN
FORENSIC FACILITY
(a) An individual shall be transferred to the forensic facility established in
section 4826 of this title if the individual has been charged with an offense
punishable by a life sentence, the individual is not deemed a “person in need of
treatment” pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 7101, and has been found not competent to
stand trial.
(b) Upon admission, the forensic facility shall cause the individual to be
evaluated for competency to stand trial not less often than the shorter of either
every six months or upon the determination by the forensic facility’s clinical
services director that the individual is likely competent to stand trial. The
results of all evaluations shall be supplied to the court and the parties to the
underlying criminal action.
(c) An individual shall remain at the forensic facility until the individual
receives a verdict in the individual’s underlying criminal case or until the
charges against the individual have been dismissed.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 49 of 55
(d) The individual shall receive competency restoration services while at
the forensic facility according to a plan approved by the forensic facility’s
clinical services director. Such services may include any appropriate
combination of medication, education, accommodations, habilitation, or other
services identified as necessary or proper to achieve and maintain competency
to stand trial. The individual’s refusal to receive competency restoration
services shall not be grounds for release or dismissal from the forensic facility.
(e) Competency restoration services shall be maintained until the individual
receives a verdict in the individual’s underlying criminal case.
(f) The Commissioner shall receive prior approval of the Criminal Division
of the Superior Court where the individual’s underlying criminal charge is
pending for any competency restoration plan involving involuntary medication.
The court shall not approve involuntary medication unless the court finds that
the involuntary medication is clinically appropriate and is likely to aid in the
restoration of the individual’s competency to stand trial.
Sec. 30. 13 V.S.A § 4819a is added to read:
§ 4819a. FORENSIC FACILITY PLACEMENT FOR INDIVIDUALS
AQUITTED OF CERTAIN CRIMES
(a) An individual shall be transferred to the forensic facility established in
section 4826 of this title if the individual has been acquitted of an offense
punishable by a life sentence pursuant to section 4819 of this chapter and the
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 50 of 55
individual is not deemed a “person in need of treatment” pursuant to 18 V.S.A.
§ 7101.
(b)(1) A hearing shall be held by the Criminal Division of the Superior
Court within 40 days after admission to the forensic facility, unless that period
is extended by the court.
(2) At the hearing, the court shall order the individual committed to the
forensic facility, unless the individual establishes by clear and convincing
evidence that the individual is no longer suffering from a mental disease or
defect, that upon the individual’s release, would create a substantial risk of
bodily injury to another person or serious damage to property of another
person. If the court finds that the individual has established the individual’s
burden under this subdivision, the court may enter an order consistent with
subdivision (d)(2) of this section.
(3) Prior to the date of the hearing, the court shall order that a
psychiatric or psychological examination of the individual be conducted, and
that a psychiatric or psychological report be filed with the court addressing the
individual’s history and present symptoms; a description of the psychiatric,
psychological, and medical tests that were employed and their results; the
examiner’s findings; and the examiner’s opinions as to diagnosis, prognosis,
and whether the individual is suffering from a mental disease or defect, that
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 51 of 55
upon the individual’s release, would create a substantial risk of bodily injury to
another person or serious damage to property of another person.
(c) A placement of an individual at the forensic facility shall be for an
indeterminate period and shall not have a specified end date. The individual
shall not be released until the individual establishes by clear and convincing
evidence that the individual is no longer suffering from a mental disease or
defect, that upon the individual’s release, would create a substantial risk of
bodily injury to another person or serious damage to property of another
person.
(d)(1) The Commissioner of Corrections shall petition the unit of the
Criminal Division of the Superior Court in which the acquittal was returned
not less frequently than the shorter of every five years or upon certification by
the clinical services director that the individual is no longer suffering from a
mental disease or defect, that upon the individual’s release, would create a
substantial risk of bodily injury to another person or serious damage to
property of another person.
(2) If the reviewing court finds by clear and convincing evidence that
the individual is no longer suffering from a mental disease or defect, that upon
the individual’s release, would create a substantial risk of bodily injury to
another person or serious damage to property of another person, the court shall:
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 52 of 55
(A) order the release of the individual under a prescribed regimen of
medical, psychiatric, or psychological care or treatment that the forensic
facility’s clinical services director has certified as appropriate, and that has
been found by the court to be appropriate; and
(B) order, as an explicit condition of release, that the individual
comply with the prescribed regimen of medical, psychiatric, or psychological
care or treatment together with any other conditions appropriate to protect the
public.
(e) The Commissioner of Corrections shall actively monitor compliance
with orders issued under subdivision (d)(2) of this section and shall
immediately return the person to the forensic facility if the Commissioner or
the Commissioner’s agents determine that the individual is noncompliant with
the order and that the noncompliance may create a risk of bodily injury to
another person or serious damage to property of another. The Commissioner
shall notify the Criminal Division of the Superior Court in the county where
the individual was acquitted upon return of the individual to the forensic
facility. Upon readmission, the court shall hold a hearing where the
Commissioner shall have the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the
evidence that the individual was noncompliant with the court’s order for
conditional release and that the noncompliance creates a risk of bodily injury
to another person or serious damage to property of another.
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 53 of 55
Sec. 31. 13 V.S.A. § 4826 is added to read:
§ 4826. FORENSIC FACILITY
(a) The Commissioner of Corrections shall establish and operate a locked
secure forensic facility for the assessment and safe housing of individuals who
are subject to any stage of proceedings under this chapter or who have been
acquitted pursuant to section 4819 of this chapter. The forensic facility shall
not refuse any individuals it is ordered to admit, nor shall it require any clinical
or diagnostic prerequisites for admission. All forensic, clinical, and
competency restoration services provided at the forensic facility shall be
overseen by a clinical services director.
(b) Any records related to an individual placed at the forensic facility shall
be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act
and shall be kept confidential, except that records shall be made available to
the parties in the underlying criminal case upon request.
(c) Individuals shall be admitted to and maintained at the forensic facility
pursuant to sections 4815a and 4819a of this section.
(d) The Commissioner shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
implement this section.
Sec. 32. RULEMAKING; FORENSIC FACILITY
Pending the adoption of permanent rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
implement the provisions of Secs. 29–31 of this act, the Commissioner of
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 54 of 55
Corrections shall adopt emergency rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 844 not later
than January 1, 2027, which shall be deemed to meet the emergency
rulemaking standard in 3 V.S.A. § 844(a).
Sec. 33. 13 V.S.A. § 4817 is amended to read:
§ 4817. COMPETENCY TO STAND TRIAL; DETERMINATION;
DISMISSAL
* * *
(e) When a person has been found incompetent to stand trial for an alleged
misdemeanor offense, the charges against the person shall be dismissed with
prejudice if, after the finding of incompetence, the case remains inactive for a
continuous period of time equal to or greater than the maximum sentence for
the offense. Dismissal under this section shall not be required if the court finds
that dismissing the case would be contrary to the interests of justice.
Sec. 34. Rule 1101 of the Vermont Rules of Evidence is amended to read:
Rule 1101. APPLICABILITY OF RULES
(a) Rules applicable. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b),
these rules apply to all actions and proceedings in the courts of this state.
(b) Rules inapplicable. The rules other than those with respect to privileges
do not apply in the following situations:
* * *
VT LEG #385977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.272
2026 Page 55 of 55
(3) Miscellaneous Proceedings. Proceedings for extradition or rendition;
inquest proceedings; except as otherwise provided by statute or rule
promulgated by the Supreme Court, sentencing or granting or revoking
probation; proceedings concerning competency restoration; granting or
revoking conditional release from a forensic facility; finding probable cause
for arrests without warrant and issuance of citations, warrants for arrest,
criminal summonses, and search warrants.
* * *
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 35. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 1–15 shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 16–34 shall take effect July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385977 v.1